New Jersey, session 221, S2616.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Any salary caps adopted by the commissioner pursuant to the authority granted under subsection j. of N.J.S.18A:7-8 shall also apply to a charter school lead person, or other person assuming administrative responsibility of a charter school. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately. STATEMENT Under current law, the executive county superintendent of schools is required to review and approve, according to standards adopted by the Commissioner of Education, all employment contracts for superintendents of schools, assistant superintendents of schools, and school business administrators in school districts within the county.  Pursuant to this section of law, the commissioner adopted regulations at N.J.A.C.6A:23A-1.2 establishing salary caps for superintendents based upon the enrollment in the district.  This bill provides that the salary caps are to also apply to a charter school lead person, or other person assuming administrative responsibility of a charter school.